Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1 General Provisions
Blocks (013300): 1000 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3080 3081 3082 4004 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038

Blocks (018101): 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3020

VTD: 20-4 Charlotte Park School

VTD: 21-4 Centennial Park Art Ctr.

Blocks (014400): 2045 2046 2056 2057 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2080 2081 2084 2085 2086

Blocks (016500): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029

Blocks (016600): 1000 1001 1002

VTD: 21-5 Centennial Park Art Ctr.

VTD: 23-1 Brook Hollow Baptist

VTD: 23-2 West Meade School

Blocks (018201): 2005 2006 2007 2009 2019 2020 2021 2022 3003 3004 3011

Blocks (018202): 1000 1001 1002 1003 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012

Blocks (018301): 3019 3026 3033

VTD: 24-1 Sylvan Park School

VTD: 24-2 TN Technology Center at Nashville

VTD: 24-3 Westminister Presbyterian Church

Blocks (016700): 4013 4014

Blocks (018000): 3005 4000 4001 4002 4003 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015

VTD: 24-4 Park Ave School

VTD: 24-5 McCabe Park Comm Ctr

VTD: 24-6 West End Middle School

Blocks (016700): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010

VTD: 25-4 Granny White Church of Christ

Blocks (017800): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010

VTD: 35-1 Gower School

Blocks (018301): 3005 3006 3009 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3020 3021 3027 3030 3031

District 56:

Davidson County

VTD: 23-3 Jewish Community Ctr

VTD: 23-4 Belle Meade City Hall

VTD: 24-3 Westminister Presbyterian Church

Blocks (018000): 3012 3013 3014 3015 3024 5000 5003 5004

VTD: 24-6 West End Middle School

Blocks (017901): 3000 3001 3002 4009 4014

Blocks (018000): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3025 5001 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012

VTD: 25-1 West End Middle School

VTD: 25-2 Boy Scouts of America

VTD: 25-4 Granny White Church of Christ

Blocks (017800): 1018 1019 1023 1024 1025 1026 2011 2012 2016 2017

VTD: 25-5 Hillsboro High School

VTD: 25-6 YWCA

VTD: 26-4 Crievewood Baptist Church

VTD: 26-5 Ellington Agricultural Center

VTD: 27-4 Christ Church

Blocks (018801): 3014 3015 3016 3018 3019 3020

VTD: 31-1 Woodson Chapel Church of Christ

VTD: 31-2 Woodson Chapel Church of Christ

Blocks (019115): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026

Blocks (019116): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013

VTD: 31-4 Granbery Elementary School

VTD: 34-1 Calvary UMC

VTD: 34-10 Forest Hills Baptist

VTD: 34-2 Hillsboro Presbyterian Church

VTD: 34-3 Percy Priest School

VTD: 34-4 John Trotwood Moore School

VTD: 34-5 Brentwood Hills Church of Christ

VTD: 34-8 Glendale UMC

Blocks (017701): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 2000 2004 2005 2010 2011 2018

Blocks (017800): 1016

VTD: 34-9 Church of the Redeemer

District 57:

Wilson County

VTD: 01 Langford Farms Club

VTD: 02 St. Stephens Catholic Comm.

VTD: 03 West Wilson Middle School

VTD: 04 Cooks UMC Church

Blocks (030202): 1009 1015 1016 1017

Blocks (030203): 1000 1004 1005 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2023 2024 2025 2035 2060 2061 2062 2066 2067 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2082 2083 2084 2085 2095

Blocks (030204): 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1066 2019 2020 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2059 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113

Blocks (030304): 3000

VTD: 05 Berea Church of Christ

Blocks (030101): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1068 1069 1070 1075 1081 1082 1083 1102 1104 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2027 2050 2051

VTD: 05 LaGuardo Utility District

VTD: 06 Carroll-Oakland School

Blocks (030101): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2025 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2052 2053

Blocks (030102): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2033 2034 2037 2042 2043 2044 2056 2057 2086

VTD: 08 Lighthouse Assembly of God

VTD: 10 Mt.Juliet Middle School

VTD: 11 Rutland Elementary School

VTD: 12 Cedars of Leb. St. Park Assembly Hall

Blocks (030903): 3033 3034 3040

VTD: 13 Gladeville Elementary

VTD: 14 Gladeville Elementary

Blocks (030903): 1078 1079 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1121 1150 1151 1152 1153 1154 1155 1156 1163 1164 1165 1166 1168 1207 2000 2005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017

VTD: 14 Silver Springs Baptist Church

VTD: 15 Full Gospel Tabernacle

VTD: 16 Center Chapel Church of Christ

VTD: 18 Lakeview Elementary School

VTD: 19 Jimmy Floyd Family Center

Blocks (030500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1009 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4017 4019 4020 4021 4022

VTD: 20 Market Street Community Center

Blocks (030500): 4016

VTD: 22 W. A. Wright Elementary School

VTD: 25 Leeville Club House

Blocks (030202): 1019 1021 1022 1023 1030 1031 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1065 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1083 1084 1085 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3078 3079 3080 3081 3091 3092 3093 3094 3095 3096 3097 3098 3099 3100 3101 3102 3103 3104 3105 3106 3107 3108 3109 3110

Blocks (030203): 2091 2092 2093 2094

District 58:

Davidson County

VTD: 01-5 Bordeaux Library

Blocks (012802): 2009 2010 2011 3008 3009 3011 3012 4028 4029 4032 4034 4035 4036

VTD: 01-6 Cathedral of Praise

Blocks (012802): 3005 3006 3007 3010

VTD: 02-1 Haynes Middle School

Blocks (012702): 1015 1016 1018 1019 1020 1024 1025 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 2045

Blocks (012801): 4011 4012

VTD: 02-2 White's Creek Pk Fire Hall #25

Blocks (012702): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2046 2047 2048 2049

VTD: 02-5 Looby Comm Ctr

VTD: 05-1 Kipp Academy

Blocks (011001): 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028

Blocks (011300): 1009 1010 1011 1012 2000 2001 2002 2003 4000 4001 4002 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4018 4019 4022 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5017

Blocks (012600): 1017 1018

Blocks (012702): 2038

VTD: 05-2 Cleveland St. Park Comm Ctr

Blocks (011300): 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 4003 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4020 4021 5014 5015 5016

Blocks (011800): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 3009 3010 3011 3012

Blocks (012600): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1050 1051 1052 1053 1066

Blocks (012702): 2051 2052 2053

VTD: 05-3 Eastland Baptist Church

Blocks (011700): 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5007 5008 5012 5013 5014

VTD: 05-4 McFerrin Park Comm. Ctr.

Blocks (011700): 6010 6011 6012 6013 6014 6016 6017 6018 6019 6020 6021 6026 6027

Blocks (011800): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013

Blocks (011900): 2004 2005 2007 2022

Blocks (012600): 1024 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065

Blocks (019300): 1014 1015

VTD: 05-5 Ross Elementary School

Blocks (011700): 6000 6001 6002 6003 6004 6005 6006 6007 6008 6009 6015 6022 6023 6024 6025 7000 7001 7002 7003 7004 7005 7006 7007 7017

Blocks (011900): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1022 2000 2001 2002 2003 2008 2009 2024 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3016

VTD: 06-1 Martha O'Bryan Center

Blocks (019200): 1047 1048 1051 1052 1055 1056

Blocks (019300): 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1054

VTD: 06-3 East Park Comm. Center

Blocks (011900): 2006 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2023 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 3012 3013 3014 3015 3017 3019 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027

Blocks (019300): 1013 1032 1033 1039 1040 1041 1042 1050 1051 1052 1053 1074

VTD: 08-1 Tom Joy School

Blocks (011300): 1003 1004 1005 1006 6000 6001 6002 6003 6004 6005 6006 6007 6008 6009 6010 6011

VTD: 16-2 Polk Ave Firehall #12

VTD: 16-3 Vultee Church of Christ

Blocks (015802): 3000

Blocks (015900): 2041 2048 2049

VTD: 16-4 Woodbine Cumberland Pres. Church

Blocks (017200): 2015 2016 2017 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2032 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2050

Blocks (017300): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3015 3016

VTD: 16-5 Woodbine Baptist Church

Blocks (015802): 3011 3020

Blocks (015900): 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057

Blocks (017300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1012 1013 3014 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039

VTD: 17-2 Trevecca Towers

VTD: 17-3 Johnson Middle School

VTD: 17-4 Sevier Park Comm. Center

Blocks (017000): 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029

Blocks (017100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 3005

VTD: 17-5 Berry Hill City Hall

Blocks (016100): 2031 2032 2033 2039 2040 2041

Blocks (017100): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2011 2012 2013

Blocks (017200): 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1011 1015 1016 1017 1018 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1060 1061

VTD: 17-6 Berry Headstart

Blocks (017200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1009 1010 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2031 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2045 2046 2047 2048

VTD: 17-7 Knowles Senior Center

VTD: 17-8 Napier School

VTD: 17-9 Edgehill Library

VTD: 18-7 Belmont Heights Baptist Church

Blocks (016300): 3012 3013 3014 3017 3022 3023 3024

VTD: 19-1 Buena Vista Elementary School

VTD: 19-2 15th Ave Baptist Church

Blocks (013900): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1043 1044 1045 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1068

Blocks (019400): 2000 2001 2074 2075 2076 2077 2079 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040

VTD: 19-3 Watkins Park Comm Ctr

VTD: 19-4 Kayne Av Baptist Church

Blocks (014400): 1013 1014 1015 1018 1020 1021 1022 1023 2052 2053 2055 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2078

Blocks (016100): 1000

Blocks (016200): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1024

Blocks (016300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012

Blocks (019400): 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1090

Blocks (019500): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2104 2105 2108 2111 2112 2113 2114 2136 2137 2139

VTD: 19-5 Murrell School

Blocks (016300): 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3015 3018 3019

Blocks (016400): 1000 1001 1018 1019 1020 1021 2000 2002

Blocks (019500): 2109 2115 2116 2117 2118

VTD: 20-2 Union Hall 737

Blocks (013000): 1002 1030 1031 1032

Blocks (013300): 4000 4001 4002 4003

Blocks (013602): 1023

VTD: 20-3 Union Hall 737

Blocks (013000): 1034

VTD: 21-1 Hadley Park Community Center

VTD: 21-2 Nashville Big Picture High School

VTD: 21-3 Pearl-Cohn High School

VTD: 21-4 Centennial Park Art Ctr.

Blocks (014400): 2032 2048 2049 2050 2051 2058

Blocks (016500): 1000

Blocks (019500): 2106 2107 2110

VTD: 21-6 Mc Gruder Center

District 59:

Davidson County

VTD: 26-1 Paragon Mills School

Blocks (019005): 1000 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012

Blocks (019006): 1004 1005 1007 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016

VTD: 28-1 Una Baptist Church

Blocks (015613): 1011 3001 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4008 4009

Blocks (015614): 1000 1001 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011

VTD: 28-3 Una Baptist Church

VTD: 28-4 Antioch Church of Christ

Blocks (015613): 1012 1013 1015 1016 1017 1018 1021 1022 1024 1025 1026 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009

Blocks (015615): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 2006 2010

Blocks (015627): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 2002 2003 2004

VTD: 28-5 Apollo Middle School

VTD: 29-1 Priest Lake Presbyterian

Blocks (015620): 1000 1006 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013

VTD: 29-3 Hamilton UMC

Blocks (015620): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1007 1008

VTD: 30-1 Haywood School

Blocks (019003): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 2000 2001 4003 4004

VTD: 30-2 Haywood Hills Baptist

Blocks (019003): 1006 1007 3000 3001 3003 3004 3009 4000 4001 4002 4005

Blocks (019108): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005

VTD: 30-3 Grace Cole School

Blocks (019109): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012

VTD: 30-4 Tusculum Hills Baptist Church

Blocks (019109): 1011

Blocks (019110): 2004 2005 2006

Blocks (019111): 3002 3003 3004 3005 3007

VTD: 32-1 Antioch UMC

Blocks (019111): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 3000 3001 3006 3008

VTD: 32-2 Bell Road Baptist

Blocks (019117): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1016 1017 1018

Blocks (019118): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 2000 2004

VTD: 32-4 Spirit of Life Church

Blocks (015629): 3015 3017

Blocks (015630): 2008 2009 2011 2012 2013 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027

Blocks (015631): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 2000 2001 2002 2003 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017

VTD: 32-5 Antioch Middle School

Blocks (015628): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010

Blocks (015629): 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3018

VTD: 33-2 New Antioch High School

Blocks (015619): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 3007 3008 3009 3010

Blocks (015620): 2000 2007 2008 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012

Blocks (015631): 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016

VTD: 33-4 Hickory Hollow Baptist

Blocks (015626): 1005 1006

District 60:

Davidson County

VTD: 11-3 Andrew Jackson School

VTD: 11-4 DuPont-Tyler Middle School

VTD: 12-1 Hermitage Presby Church

VTD: 12-2 Ruby Major Elementary

VTD: 12-3 Dupont-Tyler Middle School

VTD: 12-4 Central Pike Church of Christ

VTD: 13-4 Whitworth Baptist Christ Church

Blocks (015610): 3031

VTD: 14-1 Hermitage Hills Baptist

VTD: 14-2 Hermitage School

VTD: 14-3 TN School for the Blind

VTD: 14-5 Hickman School

VTD: 15-1 Two Rivers School

Blocks (015300): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2018 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3018 3023 3024 3025 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037

VTD: 15-2 Donelson Heights UMC

VTD: 15-3 Donelson Presbyterian Church

VTD: 15-4 Margaret Allen School

Blocks (015100): 3017 3018 3019 3020 3024

Blocks (019600): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1015 1016 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2021 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2091

VTD: 15-7 Margaret Allen School

Blocks (019600): 1012 1013 1014 1017 2069 2075 2076 2077

VTD: 33-1 Eagle Christian Church

District 61:

Williamson County

VTD: 04-1 First Presbyterian Church

VTD: 04-5 Prairie Life Fitness Center

VTD: 06-1 Concord Church of Christ

VTD: 06-2 New Hope Community Church

VTD: 07-1 Otter Creek Church

VTD: 07-2 Baptist Children's Home

VTD: 07-3 Clearview Baptist Church

VTD: 08-1 Grassland Middle School

VTD: 08-2 Curry Ingram Academy

VTD: 08-3 Episcopal Church

VTD: 09-1 Walnut Grove Elementary

Blocks (050405): 1041 1042 1043 1044 1048 1049 1051

Blocks (050406): 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014

Blocks (050601): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1015 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1066

Blocks (050701): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1013 2020 2021 2022

VTD: 09-2 Benton Hall School

VTD: 09-3 Hunter's Bend Elementary

VTD: 10-1 Williamson Recreation Center

Blocks (050601): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2032

Blocks (050702): 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020

Blocks (050800): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2007 2008 2009 2010 2017 2018 2019 2026 2027 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3017 3026

VTD: 10-2 Liberty Elementary

Blocks (050702): 2004 2005 2006 2022 2024 2025

Blocks (050905): 1034 1045 1046 3010

VTD: 12-2 People's Church

Blocks (050905): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2014 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3018 3019 3020

District 62:

Bedford County

Lincoln County

VTD: 9th Grade Academy

VTD: Askins School

VTD: Belleville Community Center

VTD: Boonshill Community Center

Blocks (975100): 1101 1102 1108

Blocks (975200): 1000 1002 1004 1066 2011 2046 2165

Blocks (975300): 4018 4019 4035 4054 4055

VTD: Calvary Baptist Fellowship Hall

VTD: Howell

VTD: Kelso Cumberland Presbyterian Church

VTD: Mulberry Fire Hall

VTD: Petersburg

VTD: Recreation Center

VTD: South Lincoln

Blocks (975400): 3089 3090 3092 3093 3094 3095 3096 3098 3099 3103 3104 3105 3106 3107

Blocks (975601): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1026

VTD: Thorton Taylor Pkwy

District 63:

Williamson County

VTD: 02-2 Grace Chapel

Blocks (050602): 1116 1149 1150 1154 1155

Blocks (050908): 1024 1025 1028 1029 1030

Blocks (050909): 1029 1030 1031 1032 1035 1036 1037 1048

VTD: 02-3 Oak View Elementary

Blocks (050908): 1006 1007 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1026 1027 1031 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027

Blocks (050909): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1018 1022 1023 1034 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1049 1050 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060

Blocks (051201): 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3068 3069 3072 3073 3074 3112

Blocks (051202): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1027 1028

VTD: 03-1 Thompson Station Baptist Church

Blocks (050909): 2061 2062

Blocks (051201): 2108

Blocks (051202): 1013 1014 1026 1029 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2008 2009 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2067 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4019 4020 4093 4094 4098 4099 4100 4101 4102 4103 4104 4105 4106 4107 4108 4109 4110 4111 4113 4114 4115 4116 4117 4118 4119 4120 4121 4122 4123 4124 4125 4133

VTD: 03-2 Bethesda Recreation Center

VTD: 03-3 College Grove School

VTD: 04-2 Millview Church of Christ

VTD: 04-3 Trinity Baptist

VTD: 04-4 Franklin Christian Church

VTD: 05-1 Brentwood Safety Center E

VTD: 05-2 Nolensville Methodist Church

VTD: 05-3 Triune Baptist Church

VTD: 05-4 Whispering Hills Church

VTD: 05-5 The Community Church

VTD: 06-3 Holy Family Catholic Church

VTD: 11-2 Moore Elementary

Blocks (050602): 1114

Blocks (050906): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022

Blocks (050908): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1008

VTD: 12-1 Franklin Faith Church

Blocks (050907): 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1026 1027 1028 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062

Blocks (050908): 2008

VTD: 12-2 People's Church

Blocks (050905): 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017

Blocks (050907): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2063

Blocks (050908): 2009

Blocks (051002): 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 3030

District 64:

Maury County

VTD: Armory

Blocks (010100): 3016 3033 3035 3114 3115 3116 3117 3119 3120 3121 3122 3123 3124 3131 3132 3133 3134 3135 3136 3137 3138 3139 3140 3141 3142 3143 3144 3145 3146 3147 3154 3155 3156 3157 3171 3175

Blocks (010201): 1048 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1080 1081 1082 1087

Blocks (010301): 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1030 1031 1032 1033 1036 1037 1041

Blocks (010400): 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4051 4052 4053 4054 4055 4056 4057 4058 4059 4060 4062 4063 4064 4065 4068 4069 4070 4071 4072 4073 4074 4075 4076 4077 4085 4086 4087 4101 4102 4103 4106 4107 4108 4126 4130 4131 4132 4133 4134 4135 4136 4138 4139 4140 4141 4142 4143 4144 4145 4146 4147 4148 4149 4150 4151 4152 4153

Blocks (010802): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1092 1093 1099 1100 1111 1128 1129 1130 1156 1157 1158 1159 1160 1161 1162 1171 1188 1189 1190

Blocks (010900): 1064 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1121

VTD: Bear Creek

Blocks (010301): 2104 2105 2106 2107 2111

Blocks (010302): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1134 1135 1136 1137 1138 1139 1140 1141 1142 1143 1144 1145 1146 1147 1148 1149 1150 1151 1152 1153 1154 1155 1156 1157 1158 1159 1160 1161 1162 1163 1164 1165 1166 1167 1168 1169 1170 1171

Blocks (010400): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004

Blocks (010500): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3013 3023 3063 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3080 3082 3083 3084 3085 3086 3087 3088 3089 3090 3091 3117 3118 3119 3120 3121 3122 3123

Blocks (011102): 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013

Blocks (011200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1063 1064 1065 1067 1069 1070 1075 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1134 1135 1136 1137 1138 1139 1140 1141 1142 1143 1144 1145 1146 1147 1148 1149 1150 1151 1152 1156 1157 1158 1159 1160 1163 1165 1166 1167 1168 1169 1170 1171 1180 1181 1182 1183 1184 1185 1186 1199 1200 1203 1205 1234 1241 1242 1245 1253 1256 1257 1258

VTD: Bigbyville

VTD: CP Church

VTD: Culleoka

VTD: First Family

VTD: Hampshire

Blocks (010900): 2058 2059 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2102 2103 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2117 2118 2119 2120 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2126 2136 2140 2141 2142 2143

Blocks (011001): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1033 1034 1037 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1168

VTD: Highland

Blocks (010700): 1004 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1020 1021 1022 1023 2001 2004 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018 5019 5020

Blocks (011101): 2000 2005 2006 2007 2008 2012 2014 2015 2018 2020 2021 2033 2043 2044 2045 2049

Blocks (011102): 2013

VTD: Mt. Pleasant

VTD: Pleasant Heights

VTD: Porters Chapel

VTD: Rally Hill

VTD: Riverside

VTD: Santa Fe

VTD: Spring Hill

VTD: St. Catherine

Blocks (010801): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1034 1035 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048

Blocks (010802): 2039 2040 2041 2046 2091 2092 2093 2094 2098 2100 2101

Blocks (011001): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2037 2038 2039 2044 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2061 2062 2063 2074 2075 2100 2101

Blocks (011002): 1000 1001 1007 1008

VTD: Theta

VTD: Tradewinds

Blocks (010700): 2000 2003 2006

Blocks (010801): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1036 1037 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043

District 65:

Williamson County

VTD: 01-1 Fairview Elementary

VTD: 01-2 Fairview Recreation Center

VTD: 01-3 Pinewood Elementary

VTD: 02-1 Hillsboro Elementary

VTD: 02-2 Grace Chapel

Blocks (050502): 3051

Blocks (050602): 1046 1047 1059 1060 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1085 1087 1088 1089 1090 1092 1093 1098 1099 1100 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1115 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1134 1135 1136 1137 1138 1139 1140 1141 1142 1143 1144 1145 1146 1147 1148 1151 1152 1153 1156 1157 1158 1159 1256 1257

Blocks (050909): 1014 1015 1016 1017 1019 1020 1021 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1033

Blocks (051201): 2011 2012 2013 2014 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2057 2065 2066 2067 2070 2071 2072 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2087 2088 2090 2091 2104 2105 2111 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3009 3010 3011 3012 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3023 3024 3025 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3039 3040 3041 3071 3075

VTD: 02-3 Oak View Elementary

Blocks (051201): 3022 3026 3027 3038 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3067 3070

VTD: 02-4 Westhaven Clubhouse

VTD: 03-1 Thompson Station Baptist Church

Blocks (051201): 2054 2055 2056 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2068 2069 2073 2074 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2089 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2100 2101 2102 2103 2106 2107 3076 3077 3078 3079

Blocks (051202): 2007 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 3000 3001 3002 3045 3046 4021 4025 4026 4075 4076 4077 4090 4091 4092 4095 4096 4097 4126 4127 4132

VTD: 03-4 Heritage Elementary

VTD: 03-5 Longview

VTD: 09-1 Walnut Grove Elementary

Blocks (050601): 1014 1016 1017 1034 1038 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059

VTD: 10-1 Williamson Recreation Center

Blocks (050601): 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1035 1036 1037 1039 1040 1041 1042 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 2026 2027 2028 2035

VTD: 10-2 Liberty Elementary

Blocks (050702): 2003 2021 2023 2026 2027 2028 2029

Blocks (050904): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037

Blocks (050905): 1049 2005 2006 2007

VTD: 10-3 Johnson Elementary

VTD: 11-1 Franklin Elementary Upper Campus

VTD: 11-2 Moore Elementary

Blocks (050906): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024

Blocks (050908): 1005

VTD: 12-1 Franklin Faith Church

Blocks (050906): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023

Blocks (050907): 1019

VTD: 12-2 People's Church

Blocks (050905): 2013 2015

Blocks (050906): 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030

District 66:

Robertson County

District 67:

Montgomery County

VTD: 11

Blocks (101103): 1016 1017 1018

VTD: 12

VTD: 13

VTD: 14

VTD: 15

Blocks (100900): 1005 1006 1008

Blocks (101001): 2017 2021 2027 2028 2029 2030 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2061

Blocks (101101): 1024

Blocks (101102): 3015 3016 3017 3018 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025

Blocks (101103): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1032

VTD: 16

Blocks (101001): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2018 2019 2020 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2031 2032 2033 2058 2059 2060 2062 2063

Blocks (101101): 1016 1017 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023

Blocks (101307): 1006 1007 1008 1009 1016 1017 1018 1019 1028 1029 1030

VTD: 17

VTD: 18

VTD: 2

Blocks (101902): 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030

Blocks (102001): 1039

VTD: 21

Blocks (100400): 1007 1008 2000 2001 2002 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2018

Blocks (100500): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023

Blocks (101802): 2014 2015 3001 3013

VTD: 5

Blocks (100200): 2000

VTD: 9

Blocks (101305): 1000 1001 1002 1004 1005 1016 1017 1018 1020

District 68:

Montgomery County

VTD: 1

VTD: 19

VTD: 2

Blocks (101902): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008

Blocks (101903): 1050 1051 1052 1053 1055 1056 1059 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016

Blocks (102001): 1031 1032 2000 2001 2025 2026

VTD: 20

VTD: 21

Blocks (100400): 2017 2019 2020 2021

Blocks (101802): 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3020

VTD: 3A

VTD: 3B

VTD: 4A

VTD: 4B

Blocks (101700): 1057 1058 1059 1082 1083 1090 2034 2035 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2073 2075 2076 4004 4006 4007 4009 4010 4020 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4051 4052 4053 4054 4055 4056 4057 4058 4059 4060 4061 4062 4063 4064 4065 4066 4067 4068 4069 4070 4071 4072 4073 4074 4075 4076 4077 4078 4079 4080 4081 5022 5039 5040 5041 5044 5045 5046 5047 5048 5049 5050 5051 5052 5053 5054 5055 5056 5057 5058 5059 5060 5061 5062 5063 5064 5065 5066 5067 5068 5069 5070 5071

VTD: 5

Blocks (100200): 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046

Blocks (100300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021

Blocks (100400): 1012 1019 1020 1021 1022 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007

VTD: 6A

VTD: 6B

Blocks (101700): 2002 2003 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2036 2037 2038 2039 2047 2048 2074 3017 3022

District 69:

Dickson County

VTD: 01-1 Charlotte CC

VTD: 01-2 Sylvia Baptist Church

VTD: 02-1 Eno Methodist

Blocks (060601): 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2016 2017 2018 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2030 2031 2033 2035 2036 2037 2041 2054 2055 2056

Blocks (060700): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2018 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2064 2065 2066 2068 2069 2070 2071 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2099 2101 2102 2103 2104 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2112 2114 2115 2116 2117 2118 2119 2139 2140 2141 2142 2143 2144 2145 2146 2148 2149 2151 2152 2153

VTD: 02-2 Tennessee City C.C.

VTD: 03-1 Cumberland Fce Firehall

VTD: 03-2 Vanleer Townhall

VTD: 04-1 Jackson Chapel C.C.

Blocks (060100): 2073
